Colorado statutes. TITLE 34 Mineral Resources
ARTICLE 50
DRAINAGE

Section

34-50-101. Common influx of water.

Whenever contiguous or adjacent mines upon the same or upon separate lodes have a common ingress of water, or from subterraneous communication of the water have a common drainage, it is the duty of the owners, lessees, or occupants of each mine so related to provide for their proportionate share of the drainage thereof.

Source:

L. 1870:

p. 82, § 1.

G.L.

§ 1830.

G.S.

§ 2416.

R.S. 08:

§ 4226.

C.L.

§ 3314.

CSA:

C. 110, § 207.

CRS 53:

§ 92-27-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-27-1.

34-50-102. Costs prorated.

Any parties so related, failing to comply with section 34-50-101 for the drainage of the mines owned or occupied by them, thereby imposing an unjust burden upon neighboring mines, whether owned or occupied by them, shall pay respectively to those performing the work of drainage, their proportion of the actual and necessary costs and expenses of doing such drainage to be recovered by an action in any court of competent jurisdiction.

Source:

L. 1870:

p. 82, § 2.

G.L.

§ 1831.

G.S.

§ 2417.

R.S. 08:

§ 4227.

C.L.

§ 3315.

CSA:

C. 110, § 208.

CRS 53:

§ 92-27-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-27-2.

34-50-103. Incorporating to drain mines.

It is lawful for mining companies and all individuals engaged in mining, having a common interest in draining such mines, to unite for the purpose of effecting the same under a common name and upon such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon. Every such association, having filed a certificate of incorporation as provided by law, shall be deemed a corporation, with all the rights, incidents, and liabilities of a body corporate, insofar as the same may be applicable.

Source:

L. 1870:

p. 82, § 3.

G.L.

§ 1832.

G.S.

§ 2418.

R.S. 08:

§ 4228.

C.L.

§ 3316.

CSA:

C. 110, § 209.

CRS 53:

§ 92-27-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-27-3.

34-50-104. Liability for noncooperation.

Failing to mutually agree as indicated in section 34-50-103 for drainage, jointly, one or more of the said parties may undertake the work of drainage, after giving reasonable notice; and should the remaining parties then fail, neglect, or refuse to unite in equitable arrangements for doing the work or sharing the expense thereof, they shall be subject to an action therefor as specified in section 34-50-102.

Source:

L. 1870:

p. 82, § 4.

G.L.

§ 1833.

G.S.

§ 2419.

R.S. 08:

§ 4229.

C.L.

§ 3317.

CSA:

C. 110, § 210.

CRS 53:

§ 92-27-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-27-4.

34-50-105. Action to recover - inspection.

When an action is commenced to recover the cost and expenses for draining a lode or mine, it is lawful for the plaintiff to apply to the court for an order to inspect and examine the lodes or mines claimed to have been drained by the plaintiff; or someone for him shall make affidavit that such inspection or examination is necessary for a proper preparation of the case for trial. The court shall grant an order for the underground inspection and examination of the lode or mines described in the petition. Such order shall designate the number of persons, not exceeding three, besides the plaintiff or his representative, to examine and inspect such lode and mines and take the measurement thereof, relating the amount of water drained from the lode or mine, or the number of fathoms of ground mined and worked out of the lode or mine claimed to have been drained, and the cost of such examination and inspection to be borne by the party applying therefor.

The court has power to cause the removal of any rock, debris, or other obstacles in any lode or vein, when such removal is shown to be necessary to a just determination of the question involved. No such order for inspection and examination shall be made except in open court or at chambers, upon notice of application for such order of at least three days, and not then except by agreement of the parties, and not unless it appears that the plaintiff has been refused the privilege of making the inspection and examination by the defendant, his or their agent.

Source:

G.L.

§ 1834.

G.S.

§ 2420.

R.S. 08:

§ 4230.

C.L.

§ 3318.

CSA:

C. 110, § 211.

CRS 53:

§ 92-27-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-27-5.

34-50-106. Right to use of water hoisted.

When any person or corporation engages in mining or milling, and in the prosecution of such business hoists or raises water from mines or natural channels, and the water flows away from the premises of such persons or corporations to any natural channel or gulch, the same shall be considered beyond the control of the party so hoisting or raising the same, and may be taken and used by other parties the same as that of natural water courses.

Source:

G.L.

§ 1835.

G.S.

§ 2421.

R.S. 08:

§ 4231.

C.L.

§ 3319.

CSA:

C. 110, § 212.

CRS 53:

§ 92-27-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-27-6.

34-50-107. Liability for flow of water hoisted.

After any such water has been so raised and flows into any such natural channel, gulch, or draw, the party so hoisting or raising the same shall only be liable for injury caused thereby, in the same manner as riparian owners along natural water courses.

Source:

G.L.

§ 1836.

G.S.

§ 2422.

R.S. 08:

§ 4232.

C.L.

§ 3320.

CSA:

C. 110, § 213.

CRS 53:

§ 92-27-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-27-7.

34-50-108. Applicable to opened mines only.

The provisions of this article shall not be construed to apply to incipient or undeveloped mines, but to those only which shall have been opened, and shall clearly derive a benefit from being drained.

Source:

G.L.

§ 1837.

G.S.

§ 2423.

R.S. 08:

§ 4233.

C.L.

§ 3321.

CSA:

C. 110, § 214.

CRS 53:

§ 92-27-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-27-8.

34-50-109. Evidence to be considered by court.

In the trial of cases arising under this article, the court shall admit evidence of the normal stand or position of the water while at rest in an idle mine; also the observed prevalence of a common water level or a standing water line in the same or separate lodes; also the effect, if any, the elevating or depressing the water by natural or mechanical means in any given lode has upon elevating or depressing the water in the same contiguous or separate lodes or mines; also the effect which draining or ceasing to drain any given lode or mine had upon the water in the same or contiguous or separate lodes or mines, and all other evidence which tends to prove the common ingress or subterraneous communication of water into the same lode or mine, or contiguous or separate lodes or mines.

Source:

G.L.

§ 1838.

G.S.

§ 2424.

R.S. 08:

§ 4234.

C.L.

§ 3322.

CSA:

C. 110, § 215.

CRS 53:

§ 92-27-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-27-9.